Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1109
Qualified community development entity,
defined.

Qualified
community development entity has the meaning given such term in section 45D
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if such entity has entered
into an allocation agreement with the Community Development Financial Institutions
Fund of the United States Department of the Treasury with respect to credits
authorized by section 45D of the code which includes the State of Nebraska
within the service area set forth in such allocation agreement. The term includes
affiliated entities and subordinate community development entities of any
such qualified community development entity.

Laws 2012, LB1128, § 9.